Illinois, session 104th, SB2957.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Tariff 5Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Consumer" means a natural person living in this State.8    "Retail establishment" means any business establishment, 9operating at a physical or virtual location, that engages in 10selling retail products or services directly to consumers in 11this State.12    "Retail price" means the posted price available to any 13customer of the retail establishment.14    "Retail product" means any merchandise, article, or 15commodity of any kind or class produced, distributed, or 16offered for retail sale for consumption by individuals other 17than at the retail establishment, or in the performance of 18services rendered within the household, and that is consumed 19or expended in the course of use.20    "Tariff" means any duty or trade-related import tax paid, 21as required by United States Customs and Border Protection, on 22any incoming raw material, component, or retail product at the 23point of entry.  SB2957- 2 -LRB104 16966 SPS 30380 b1    "Wholesale trade firm" means any business establishment 2that purchases raw materials, components, or retail products 3in bulk quantities for the purpose of reselling the goods to 4retail establishments. 5    Section 10. Tariff cost disclosure.6    (a) A retail establishment shall disclose the percentage 7or dollar amount of the retail price of a retail product that 8is attributable to tariffs.9    (b) The disclosure of the tariff portion of the retail 10price required under subsection (a) shall be:11        (1) visible on the point of sale display tag;12        (2) visible on the online product page;13        (3) itemized on the printed receipt provided at the 14    conclusion of the point of sale transaction; or15        (4) disclosed in a manner deemed appropriate by the 16    Attorney General. 17    Section 15. Recordkeeping requirements.18    (a) A retail establishment shall maintain records of 19tariff calculations based on, as applicable, wholesale 20invoices, customs invoices, tariffs schedules, and import duty 21records.22    (b) A wholesale trade firm that provides retail products 23to retail establishments shall maintain records on tariffs 24paid, including, but not limited to, United States Customs and   SB2957- 3 -LRB104 16966 SPS 30380 b1Border Protection filings, invoices to retailers and other 2direct customers, tariff schedules, and import duty records. 3The wholesale trade firm shall provide a retail establishment 4with any information concerning tariffs that is necessary for 5the retail establishment to comply with this Act. 6    Section 20. Audit requirements.7    (a) All retail establishments subject to this Act shall be 8subject to periodic audits. All audit compliance requirements 9shall be determined by the Attorney General by rule.10    (b) An audit related to tariff pricing disclosure as 11required under subsection (a) shall be limited to compliance 12with this Act and shall not be used to provide the sole 13evidence of violations of any other law. 14    Section 25. Enforcement by Attorney General. A violation 15of any of the provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice 16under the Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. 17All remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 18General by that Act shall be available to him or her for the 19enforcement of this Act. 20    Section 30. Exemptions. This Act does not apply to:21        (1) retail establishments generating less than 22    $500,000 in annual revenue; and23        (2) retail products on which the tariff-related price   SB2957- 4 -LRB104 16966 SPS 30380 b1    impact is less than 2% of the final retail price. 2    Section 35. Rulemaking. The Attorney General shall adopt 3rules to provide for the manner in which the tariff portion of 4a retail price shall be calculated and displayed and to 5establish and modify a list of retail products and retail 6establishments exempt from the requirements of this Act. The 7Attorney General shall not exempt retail products or retail 8establishments from the requirements of this Act except where 9compliance would be impractical, unreasonably burdensome, or 10unnecessary for adequate protection of consumers. 11    Section 40. Public notice. The Attorney General shall 12maintain and make available to the public a list of specific 13retail products and specific retail establishments exempt from 14the requirements of this Act and a list of all classes of 15retail products and all classes of retail establishments 16required to be in compliance with this Act. 17    Section 45. Compliance schedule.18    (a) During the first 6-month period immediately following 19the effective date of this Act, compliance with this Act shall 20be voluntary.21    (b) During the second 6-month period immediately following 22the effective date of this Act, retail establishments that 23have $5,000,000 or more in annual sales and are not otherwise   SB2957- 5 -LRB104 16966 SPS 30380 b1exempt from this Act shall comply with this Act.2    (c) One year after the effective date of this Act, all 3retail establishments that are not otherwise exempt from this 4Act shall comply with this Act. 5    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 6Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 7    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)8    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Tariff Transparency Act. A 9person who violates the Tariff Transparency Act commits an 10unlawful practice within the meaning of this Act. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 90 days 12after becoming law.